Maryland, session 2025, HB1371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–1002.
(a) The Administration may issue an electronic credential to an individual in
addition to, and not instead of, a license or an identification card if the Administration has
issued to the individual:
(1) A license; or
(2) An identification card under § 12–301 of this article.
(b) The Administration may enter into agreements with an agency of the State,
another state, or the United States, OR THROUGH A NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF MOTOR
VEHICLE AGENCIES, to facilitate the issuance, use, and verification of electronic
credentials issued by the Administration or another state.
(c) The Administration may create an electronic credential that:
(1) Is capable of producing both a full profile and a limited profile; and
– 1 –

Ch. 565 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Satisfies the purpose for which the profile is being presented.
(d) The Administration shall design the electronic credential in a manner that
allows the credential holder to maintain physical possession of the device on which the
electronic credential is accessed during verification.
18–103.
(a) A person may not rent a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer to any other
person unless the individual who will operate the rented vehicle:
(1) (I) Holds a driver’s license issued under Title 16 of this article,
which license authorizes [him] THE INDIVIDUAL to drive or tow, as the case may be,
vehicles of the class rented; OR
(II) POSSESSES AN ELECTRONIC CREDENTIAL ISSUED UNDER
TITLE 16, SUBTITLE 10 OF THIS ARTICLE SHOWING A REPRESENTATION OF A VALID
DRIVER’S LICENSE;
(2) Is a nonresident who:
(i) 1. Has with [him] THE INDIVIDUAL a license to drive issued
to [him] THE INDIVIDUAL by the state or country of [his] THE INDIVIDUAL’S residence,
which license authorizes [him] THE INDIVIDUAL in that state or country to drive or tow,
as the case may be, vehicles of the class rented; OR
2. POSSESSES AN ELECTRONIC CREDENTIAL ISSUED BY
THE INDIVIDUAL’S STATE OF RESIDENCE SHOWING A REPRESENTATION OF A VALID
DRIVER’S LICENSE, IF THE INDIVIDUAL’S STATE OF RESIDENCE HAS ENTERED INTO
A FACILITATION AGREEMENT WITH THE ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 16–1002(B) OF
THIS ARTICLE; and
(ii) Is at least the same age as that required of a resident to drive or
tow, as the case may be, the vehicle rented; or
(3) Otherwise is specifically authorized by Title 16 of this article to drive
or tow, as the case may be, vehicles of the class rented.
(b) (1) A person may not rent a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer to any
other person unless the lessor or his agent:
(i) Has inspected the license to drive OR ELECTRONIC
CREDENTIAL of the individual who will operate the rented vehicle;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 565
(ii) Has compared and verified:
1. The signature on the license OR ELECTRONIC
CREDENTIAL with the signature of the individual, as written in the presence of the lessor
or agent; and
2. The physical description on the license OR ELECTRONIC
CREDENTIAL with the physical appearance of the individual; and
(iii) Has verified that the license is not expired.
(2) An inspection of a license OR AN ELECTRONIC CREDENTIAL under
this section may be through electronic or digital means.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act may not be construed
to affect the ability of the Motor Vehicle Administration to authorize and implement the
use of electronic credentials in matters other than rental vehicle transactions.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –